Illinois, session 104th, HB215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 51986 is amended by changing Section 101.01 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 105/101.01)  (from Ch. 32, par. 101.01)7    Sec. 101.01. Short title. This Act shall be known and and 8may be cited as the "General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 91986".10(Source: P.A. 84-1423.)